Rhode Island, session 2025, SB353.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 10-3-2, 10-3-22, 10-3-23 and, 10-3-24 of the General Laws in
Chapter 10-3 entitled "Arbitration" are hereby amended to read as follows:
10-3-2. Agreements to arbitrate subject to chapter — Notice.
(a) When clearly written and expressed, a provision in a written contract to settle by
arbitration a controversy thereafter arising out of such contract, or out of the refusal to perform the
whole or any part thereof, or an agreement in writing between two (2) or more persons to submit
to arbitration any controversy existing between them at the time of the agreement to submit shall
be valid, irrevocable, and enforceable, save upon such grounds as exist at law or in equity for the
revocation of any contract; provided, however, that the provisions of this chapter shall not apply
to, arbitration agreements governed by 9 U.S.C. §§ 1 through 16, collective contracts between
employers and employees, or between employers and associations of employees, in respect to terms
or conditions of employment; and provided further, that in all contracts of primary insurance,
wherein the provision for arbitration is not placed immediately before the testimonium clause or
the signature of the parties, the arbitration procedure may be enforced at the option of the insured,
and in the event the insured exercises the option to arbitrate, then the provisions of this chapter
shall apply and be the exclusive remedy available to the insured.
(b) Notice of intention to arbitrate. A party may serve upon another party a demand for
arbitration or a notice of intention to arbitrate, specifying the agreement pursuant to which

arbitration is sought and the name and address of the party serving the notice, or of an officer or
agent thereof if such party is an association or corporation, and stating that unless the party served
applies to stay the arbitration within twenty (20) one hundred-eighty (180) days after such service
they shall thereafter be precluded from objecting that a valid agreement was not made or has not
been complied with and from asserting in court the bar of a limitation of time. Such notice or
demand shall be served in the same manner as a summons or by registered or certified mail, return
receipt requested. An application to stay arbitration shall be made by the party served within twenty
(20) one hundred-eighty (180) days after service upon the party of the notice or demand, or they
shall be so precluded. Notice of such application shall be served in the same manner as a summons
or by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested. Service of the application may be made
upon the adverse party, or upon their attorney if the attorneys’ name appears on the demand for
arbitration or the notice of intention to arbitrate. Service of the application by mail shall be timely
if such application is posted within the prescribed period. Any provision in an arbitration agreement
or arbitration rules that waives the right to apply for a stay of arbitration or prescribes a manner of
notifying a party of an intention to commence arbitration that is more burdensome than that
described in this section is hereby declared null and void.
(c) The party required to send notice pursuant to subsection (b) of this section shall
affirmatively include in the notice the rights being waived by failure to apply for the stay of
arbitration. Said notice shall be done in bold print and highlighted.
10-3-22. Right to representation.
A party has the right to be represented by an attorney and may claim such right at any time
as to any part of the arbitration or hearings that have not taken place. This right may not be waived.
If a party is represented by an attorney, papers to be served on the party shall be served upon the
party’s attorney. Any provision of an agreement that discriminates against or penalizes a party for
retaining the services of counsel in an arbitration is null and void.
10-3-23. Fees and costs of arbitration initiation — Invoice — Breach of agreement —
Sanctions.
(a)(1) In an employment or consumer arbitration that requires, either expressly or through
application of state or federal law or the rules of the arbitration provider, unless there is a mutually
agreed upon provision to split costs equally, the drafting party, unless otherwise specified, is to pay
certain fees and costs before the arbitration can proceed. If the fees or costs to initiate an arbitration
proceeding are not paid within thirty (30) days after the due date the drafting party is in default and
the arbitration provider shall send notice of default to the drafting party. If the drafting party fails
to cure the default within fifteen (15) days after notice of the default or to file an action in court or
LC001504 - Page 2 of 6

a motion in arbitration to challenge whether the arbitration filings or notice of default are proper,
the drafting party is in material breach of the arbitration agreement, is in default of the arbitration,
and waives its right to compel arbitration under § 10-3-4.
(2) After an employee or consumer meets the filing requirements necessary to initiate an
arbitration, the arbitration provider shall immediately provide an invoice for any fees and costs
required before the arbitration can proceed to all of the parties to the arbitration. The invoice shall
be provided in its entirety, shall state the full amount owed and the date that payment is due, and
shall be sent to all parties by the same means on the same day. To avoid delay, absent an express
provision in the arbitration agreement stating the number of days in which the parties to the
arbitration must pay any required fees or costs, the arbitration provider shall issue all invoices to
the parties as due upon receipt.
(b) If the drafting party materially breaches the arbitration agreement and is in default under
subsection (a) of this section, the employee or consumer may do either of the following:
(1) Withdraw the claim from arbitration and proceed in a court of appropriate jurisdiction;
or
(2) Compel arbitration in which the drafting party shall pay reasonable attorneys’ fees and
costs related to the arbitration.
(c) If the employee, consumer, or other involved party withdraws the claim from arbitration
and proceeds with an action in a court of appropriate jurisdiction under subsection (b)(1) of this
section, the statute of limitations with regard to all claims brought or that relate back to any claim
brought in arbitration shall be tolled as of the date of the first filing of a claim in a court, arbitration
forum, or other dispute resolution forum.
(d) If the employee or consumer proceeds with an action in a court of appropriate
jurisdiction, the court shall impose sanctions on the drafting party in accordance with § 10-3-25.
10-3-24. Material breach of agreement — Remedies.
(a)(1) In an employment or consumer arbitration that requires, either expressly or through
application of state or federal law or the rules of the arbitration provider, that the drafting party pay
certain fees and costs during the pendency of an arbitration proceeding, if the fees or costs required
to continue the arbitration proceeding are not paid within thirty (30) days after the due date, the
drafting party is in default and the arbitration provider shall send notice of default to the drafting
party. If the drafting party fails to cure the default within fifteen (15) days after notice of the default
or to file an action in court or a motion in arbitration to challenge whether the arbitration filings or
notice of default are proper, the drafting party is in material breach of the arbitration agreement, is
in default of the arbitration, and waives its right to compel the employee or consumer to proceed
LC001504 - Page 3 of 6

with that arbitration as a result of the material breach.
(2) The arbitration provider shall provide an invoice for any fees and costs required for the
arbitration proceeding to continue to all of the parties to the arbitration. The invoice shall be
provided in its entirety, shall state the full amount owed and the date that payment is due, and shall
be sent to all parties by the same means on the same day. To avoid delay, absent an express
provision in the arbitration agreement stating the number of days in which the parties to the
arbitration must pay any required fees or costs, the arbitration provider shall issue all invoices to
the parties as due upon receipt. Any extension of time for the due date shall be agreed upon by all
parties.
(b) If the drafting party materially breaches the arbitration agreement and is in default under
subsection (a) of this section, the employee or consumer may unilaterally elect to do any of the
following:
(1) Withdraw the claim from arbitration and proceed in a court of appropriate jurisdiction.
If the employee or consumer withdraws the claim from arbitration and proceeds with an action in
a court of appropriate jurisdiction, the statute of limitations, with regard to all claims brought or
that relate back to any claim brought in arbitration, shall be tolled as of the date of the first filing
of a claim in any court, arbitration forum, or other dispute resolution forum;
(2) Continue the arbitration proceeding, if the arbitration provider agrees to continue
administering the proceeding, notwithstanding the drafting party’s failure to pay fees or costs. The
neutral arbitrator or arbitration provider may institute a collection action at the conclusion of the
arbitration proceeding against the drafting party that is in default of the arbitration for payment of
all fees associated with the employment or consumer arbitration proceeding, including the cost of
administering any proceedings after the default;
(3) Petition the court for an order compelling the drafting party to pay all arbitration fees
that the drafting party is obligated to pay under the arbitration agreement or the rules of the
arbitration provider; or
(4) Pay the drafting party’s fees and proceed with the arbitration proceeding. As part of the
award, the employee or consumer shall recover all arbitration fees paid on behalf of the drafting
party without regard to any findings on the merits in the underlying arbitration.
(c) If the employee or consumer withdraws the claim from arbitration and proceeds in a
court of appropriate jurisdiction pursuant to subsection (b)(1) of this section, both of the following
apply:
(1) The employee or consumer may bring a motion, or a separate action, to recover all
attorneys’ fees and all costs associated with the abandoned arbitration proceeding. The recovery of
LC001504 - Page 4 of 6

arbitration fees, interest, and related attorneys’ fees shall be without regard to any findings on the
merits in the underlying action or arbitration; and
(2) The court shall impose sanctions on the drafting party in accordance with § 10-3-25.
(d) If the employee or consumer continues in arbitration pursuant to subsections (b)(2)
through (4) of this section, inclusive, the arbitrator shall impose appropriate sanctions on the
drafting party, including monetary sanctions, issue sanctions, evidence sanctions, or terminating
sanctions.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2026
========
LC001504
========
LC001504 - Page 5 of 6